sl-SI: Tip vpenjala mine pri šestilu: Držalo za mino; Samo s konico (šestilo); Držalo za svinčnik; Vključen nadomestni vložek; Adapter za tehnično pisalo; Univerzalna sponka (mina/svinčnik); Drugo
nl: Tekenpasser loodhoudertype: Stifthouder; Alleen naaldpunt (verdeelpasser); Potloodhouder; Inclusief vervangend inzetstuk; Adapter voor technische pen; Universele klem (stift/potlood); Overige
nb: Drafting kompass kundeemne holder type: Stifteholder; Kun nålespiss (stikkpasser); Blyantholder; Erstatningsinnsats inkludert; Adapter for teknisk penn; Universalklemme (stift/blyant); Annet
pt-PT: Elaboração de bússola oportunidade potencial titular tipo: Suporte para minas; Apenas ponta de agulha (divisor); Suporte para lápis; Acessório de substituição incluído; Adaptador de caneta técnica; Grampo universal (mina/lápis); Outro
bg-BG: Тип държач за графит/пълнител на пергел: Държач за графит; Само с игла (разделител); Държач за молив; Включена резервна приставка; Адаптер за рапидограф (техническа писалка); Универсална скоба (графит/молив); Друго
sv: Typ av blyertshållare för passare: Stifthållare; Endast nålspets (passare); Pennhållare; Utbytesinsats ingår; Adapter för ritpenna; Universell klämma (stift/penna); Övrigt
th: ประเภทของปลอกจับไส้ดินสอของวงเวียนเขียนแบบ: ที่จับไส้ดินสอ; เข็มปลายแหลมเท่านั้น (วงเวียนแบ่งส่วน); ที่จับดินสอ; มีไส้สำรอง; อะแดปเตอร์ปากกาเขียนแบบ; แคลมป์อเนกประสงค์ (ไส้/ดินสอ); อื่นๆ
pl: Typ uchwytu grafitu w cyrklu kreślarskim: Uchwyt na wkład; Tylko igła (kroczek); Uchwyt na ołówek; Zawiera wymienny wkład; Adapter do pisaka technicznego / rapidografu; Uniwersalny zacisk (wkład/ołówek); Inne
en: Drafting compass lead holder type: Lead holder; Needle point only (divider); Pencil holder; Replacement insert included; Technical pen adapter; Universal clamp (lead/pencil); Other
ro-RO: Tipul mecanismului de fixare a minei în compasul de desen tehnic: Suport pentru mină; Doar vârf ascuțit (compas de măsură); Suport pentru creion; Inserție de schimb inclusă; Adaptor pentru stilou tehnic; Clemă universală (mină/creion); Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de porta-minas para compasso de desenho: Porta-minas; Apenas ponta de agulha (compasso de ponta seca); Suporte para lápis; Inserto de reposição incluído; Adaptador para caneta técnica; Grampo universal (grafite/lápis); Outros
es: Tipo de portaminas del compás de dibujo: Soporte para mina; Solo punta de aguja (divisor); Soporte para lápiz; Inserto de repuesto incluido; Adaptador para estilógrafo; Abrazadera universal (mina/lápiz); Otro
it: Portamine per compasso lead disegno: Portamine; Solo punta ad ago (divisore); Portamatita; Inserto di ricambio incluso; Adattatore per penna a china; Morsetto universale (mina/matita); Altro
hu: Rajzkörző grafittartó típusa: Hegytartó; Csak tűhegy (körző); Ceruzatartó; Cserélhető betéttel; Műszaki rajztoll adapter; Univerzális szorító (hegy/ceruza); Egyéb
fr: Type de porte-mine de compas: Porte-mine; Pointe sèche uniquement (compas à pointes sèches); Porte-crayon; Insert de rechange inclus; Adaptateur pour stylo technique; Pince universelle (mine/crayon); Autre
el: Τύπος συγκράτησης γραφίδας διαβήτη σχεδίασης: Υποδοχή μύτης; Μόνο μύτη βελόνας (διαβήτης διαίρεσης); Υποδοχή μολυβιού; Περιλαμβάνεται ανταλλακτικό ένθετο; Προσαρμογέας τεχνικού στυλό; Σφιγκτήρας γενικής χρήσης (μύτη/μολύβι); Άλλο
da: Type stiftholdere til passer: Stiftholder; Kun nålespids (passer); Blyantsholder; Ekstra indsats medfølger; Adapter til teknisk pen; Universalklemme (stift/blyant); Andet
zh-TW: 繪圖圓規筆芯夾持器類型: 筆芯夾; 僅限針尖 (分規); 鉛筆夾; 包含替換嵌件; 針筆轉接器; 通用夾具 (筆芯/鉛筆); 其他
zh-CN: 绘图圆规插入件支架类型: 铅芯夹; 仅针尖（分规）; 铅笔夹; 包含替换芯; 针管笔适配器; 通用夹具（铅芯/铅笔）; 其他
lt-LT: Braižymo skriestuvo švino laikiklio tipas: Šerdelės laikiklis; Tik adatos smaigalys (skriestuvas matuoklis); Pieštuko laikiklis; Pridėtas atsarginis įdėklas; Techninio rašiklio adapteris; Universalus laikiklis (šerdelei / pieštukui); Kita
ru: Тип держателя грифеля чертежного циркуля: Держатель грифеля; Только игла (измеритель); Держатель карандаша; Сменная вставка в комплекте; Адаптер для рапидографа; Универсальный зажим (грифель/карандаш); Другое
ko: 제도용 컴퍼스 심 홀더 유형: 심 홀더; 니들 포인트 전용(디바이더); 연필 홀더; 교체용 인서트 포함; 제도용 펜 어댑터; 범용 클램프(심/연필); 기타
hr-HR: Izrada kompasa potencijalni kupac holder type: Držač mine; Samo vrh igle (razdjelnik); Držač olovke; Uključen zamjenski umetak; Adapter za tehničku olovku; Univerzalna stezaljka (mina/olovka); Ostalo
fi: Tarkkuusharpin pidiketyyppi: Lyijypidin; Vain neulakärki (jakoharppi); Kynäpidin; Sisältää vaihtoterän; Teknisen kynän sovitin; Yleiskiristin (lyijy/kynä); Muu
vi: Loại giá đỡ ngòi compa vẽ kỹ thuật: Đầu giữ ngòi chì; Chỉ có mũi kim (compa đo); Đầu giữ bút chì; Kèm đầu gắn thay thế; Đầu chuyển bút vẽ kỹ thuật; Kẹp đa năng (ngòi/bút chì); Khác
sk-SK: Typ držiaka tuhy rysovacieho kružidla: Držiak na tuhu; Iba ihlový hrot (odpichovadlo); Držiak na ceruzku; S náhradnou vložkou; Adaptér na technické pero; Univerzálna svorka (tuha/ceruzka); Iný
de: Art des Minenhalters des Zeichenzirkels: Minenhalter; Nur Nadelspitze (Stechzirkel); Bleistifthalter; Ersatzeinsatz inbegriffen; Tuschefüller-Adapter; Universalklemme (Mine/Bleistift); Sonstige
ja: 製図コンパスリードホルダータイプ: 芯ホルダー; 針先のみ (ディバイダー); 鉛筆ホルダー; 交換用インサート付属; 製図用ペンアダプター; ユニバーサルクランプ (芯/鉛筆); その他
tr: Pergel uç tutucu türü: Uç tutucu; Yalnızca iğne uç (bölücü pergel); Kalem tutucu; Yedek eklenti dahil; Teknik çizim kalemi adaptörü; Evrensel kelepçe (uç/kalem); Diğer
cs: Typ držáku tuhy pro kreslící kompas: Držák tuhy; Pouze jehla (odpichovátko); Držák tužky; Včetně náhradní tuhy; Adaptér na technické pero; Univerzální svorka (tuha/tužka); Jiné